Delaware, session 153, HB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2724, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2724. Medical evaluation of drivers; suspension; review. (d) After review, each member of the Medical Advisory Board and the vision consultants shall report their recommendations to the Secretary. The members of the Board and the vision consultants shall not meet as a group unless such a meeting is called by the Chairperson, but rather each member and consultant shall arrive at an opinion independently and shall inform the Secretary of the memberâs or consultantâs recommendations. These recommendations may involve any of the following by way of illustration but not of limitation: (1) No action against driver or applicant; applicant. (2) Periodic medical or optometric evaluation; evaluation. (3) Specific license restrictions; restrictions. (4) Further medical or optometric evaluation; evaluation. (5) Driver improvement activity, including retesting; retesting. (6) License suspension. suspension or cancellation. (e) The Secretary shall make the final decision on whether the driver or applicant for a license should be licensed, refused, issued a restricted license license, or have the license suspended. suspended or cancelled. (h) Upon the Secretaryâs decision to suspend or cancel a license, the holder of the license may either physically surrender the license or sign documentation required by the Department to affirm the holderâs understanding that the holder is prohibited from driving during the period of suspension or cancellation and that retention of the physical license does not authorize the holder to operate a motor vehicle. (i) At the end of a period of suspension or cancellation and provided that the physical license expiration date has not passed, driving privileges must be reinstated for a non-surrendered license and no reinstatement fee may be required. Section 2. Amend Â§ 2737, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2737. Fee for return of suspended license and/or driving privileges. Any A person whose license and/or or driving privileges has been is suspended or disqualified , except a person whose license or driving privileges were suspended or canceled due to a physical, visual, or mental disqualification for licensure under Â§ 2724 of this title, shall must pay a fee of $50 at the end of such suspension or disqualification for the return of the personâs license and/or the reinstatement of the personâs driving privileges. Section 3. Amend Â§ 2751, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2751. Unlawful application for or use of license or identification card. (c) Display of canceled licenses. â A person shall not display, cause or permit to be displayed, any canceled license. license except as permitted under Â§ 2724(h) of this title. (e) Display of suspended licenses. â A person shall not display, cause or permit to be displayed, any suspended license. license except as permitted under Â§ 2724(h) of this title. (h) Possession of canceled license. â A person shall not possess any canceled license. license except as permitted under Â§ 2724(h) of this title. (j) Possession of suspended license. â A person shall not possess any suspended license. license except as permitted under Â§ 2724(h) of this title. (o) Failure or refusal to surrender license or identification card. â A person shall may not fail or refuse to surrender to the Department on its lawful demand any license or identification card that has been suspended, revoked, canceled, altered altered, or otherwise fraudulently obtained. The Department may establish alternative means for the surrender of a license or identification.